Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB266.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1516(c) introductory paragraph of Title 4 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:§ 1516. List of persons self excluded from gaming activities.* * *(c) Liability.--[A] Subject to subsections (c.1) and (c.2), a licensed gaming entity or employee thereof shall not be liable to any self-excluded person or to any other party in any judicial proceeding for any harm, monetary or otherwise, which may arise as a result of:* * *(c.1) Prohibition against direct marketing to self-excluded 123456789101112131415161718 persons.--A licensed gaming entity or gaming employee:(1) Shall ensure that a self-excluded person does not receive direct advertising or marketing materials that communicate inducements, promotions, bonuses, credits, rewards, free plays or other offers from the licensed gaming entity, including, but not exclusive of, direct mail, email, texts, telephone calls and direct messaging via social media.(2) Shall ensure that all direct marketing lists are kept updated to ensure that all self-excluded persons are not directly targeted with advertising or marketing materials that offer promotions, credits, bonuses or other offers.(3) May not permit a self-excluded person to be able to redeem points, bonuses, free plays, comps or risk-free bets while on the exclusion list.(4) Shall deny access to complimentary services or items, check-cashing privileges, player reward programs and other similar benefits and perquisites to persons on a self-excluded list.(5) May not extend credit to any individual on the self-exclusion list.(6) May not permit participation in a cashless wagering system to any individual on the self-exclusion list.(7) May not pay any winnings, money, credits or anything of value derived from gaming to an individual on the voluntary self-exclusion list.(c.2) Duty to maintain and update self-exclusion and no-marketing lists.--(1) A licensed gaming entity shall immediately remove a self-excluded person's name, resident address, email address, telephone number, contact information or any other means of 20250SB0266PN0218 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 communication or contact from the list of patrons to whom direct marketing materials and promotions are sent while the self-excluded person's name appears on the list of persons self-excluded from gaming activities, including interactive gaming, at all licensed facilities.(2) A licensed gaming entity shall update the licensed gaming entity's internal management system to track individuals on the self-exclusion list at least every 48 hours to ensure that names of individuals are added or removed from the self-exclusion list and concomitantly removed from any list or database utilized for direct marketing and advertising.(3) A licensed gaming entity may share the list of voluntary self-excluded persons with an affiliate or related entities in other facilities or jurisdictions for the purpose of assisting in the proper administration of responsible gaming programs operated by a licensed gaming entity and its affiliates and related entities. A licensed gaming entity shall include the name and all contact information of persons on the self-exclusion list in the licensed gaming entity's aggregated no-marketing list to be shared with marketing contractors and other third-party agents retained for or involved in the distribution of advertising and marketing materials on behalf of the licensed gaming entity.* * *Section 2. Section 1518(b)(1)(ii) and (2) of Title 4 are amended and subsection (a) is amended by adding paragraphs to read:§ 1518. Prohibited acts; penalties.(a) Criminal offenses.--20250SB0266PN0218 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *(18) It shall be unlawful for a licensed gaming entity to send or transmit direct advertising or marketing materials that offer promotions, credits, bonuses or other offers to individuals who appear on the self-exclusion list.(19) It shall be unlawful for a licensed gaming entity to fail to maintain updated lists of persons on the self-exclusion list and a related no-marketing list that includes self-excluded persons.(b) Criminal penalties and fines.--(1) * * *(ii) A person that violates subsection (a)(2), (3) and (4) through (12) or (17), (18) and (19) commits a misdemeanor of the first degree. A person that is convicted of a second or subsequent violation of subsection (a)(2), (3) and (4) through (12) or (17), (18) and (19) commits a felony of the second degree.(2) (i) For a first violation of subsection (a)(1) through (12) or (17), (18) and (19), a person shall be sentenced to pay a fine of:(A) not more than $150,000 if the person is an individual;(B) not less than $300,000 nor more than $600,000 if the person is a licensed gaming entity or an interactive gaming operator; or(C) not less than $150,000 nor more than $300,000 if the person is a licensed manufacturer or supplier.(ii) For a second or subsequent violation of subsection (a)(1), (2), (3) and (4) through (12) or (17), 20250SB0266PN0218 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (18) and (19), a person shall be sentenced to pay a fine of:(A) not more than $300,000 if the person is an individual;(B) not less than $600,000 nor more than $1,200,000 if the person is a licensed gaming entity; or(C) not less than $300,000 nor more than $600,000 if the person is a licensed manufacturer or supplier.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0266PN0218 - 5 - 123456789101112